Washington statutes.
RCW 39.64.040

Petition in bankruptcy.

Subject to the requirement in RCW 28A.315.225(2), any taxing district in the state of Washington is hereby authorized to file the petition mentioned in section 80 of chapter IX of the federal bankruptcy act.

[ 2012 c 186 s 19; 1935 c 143 s 5; RRS s 5608-5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 186: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.

Rule-making authority—2012 c 186: See RCW 28A.315.902.